Utah statutes.
63A-14-606.   Comments on complaint under review by Legislature.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), while a complaint is under review by the Legislature, a member of the commission may not comment publicly or privately about the commission's decision, reasoning, or other matters relating to the ethics complaint, but may provide or refer a questioner to the commission's written finding.

(2)  Subsection (1) does not prohibit statements made:

(a)  to an individual authorized by the Legislature to conduct an investigation for the purpose of assisting the Legislature in conducting proceedings related to impeachment or removal from office;

(b)  to a legislative committee, the House, or the Senate in relation to proceedings for impeachment or trial of impeachment; or

(c)  as part of a criminal investigation.



Enacted by Chapter 426, 2013 General Session

